Arkansas, session 2025, SB265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 8-5-204(a), concerning the membership of
the licensing committee relating to wastewater, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) There is created and established a licensing committee the
"Wastewater Licensing Committee" to advise and assist the Arkansas Pollution
Control and Ecology Commission and the Division of Environmental Quality in
the administration of the licensing program.
(2) The committee shall be composed of eight (8) five (5)
members:
*JMB237*
03-05-2025 13:50:37 JMB237

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 H3/5/25 SB265
(A) Five (5) Three (3) members, to be appointed by the
commission, of which three (3) two (2) members shall be active wastewater
treatment plant operators licensed by the commission and two (2) members one
(1) member shall be employed by a private corporation or industry located in
Arkansas and nominated at large by the corporations or industries for service
on the committee;
(B) One (1) member, to be appointed by the commission,
shall be an employee of a municipality operating a wastewater treatment plant
who holds the position of chief administrative officer, city engineer,
director of public utilities, or other equivalent position;
(C) One (1) member, to be appointed by the commission,
shall be a faculty member of an accredited college, university, or
professional school in this state whose major field is related to water
resources or sanitary engineering; and
(D)(C) One (1) member shall be the Director of the
Division of Environmental Quality or a qualified member of his or her staff
who shall act as executive secretary of the committee.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 8-6-904(a) and (b), concerning the
licensing committee relating to solid waste, are amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) There is created a licensing committee the "Solid Waste
Licensing Committee" to advise and assist the Arkansas Pollution Control and
Ecology Commission and the Division of Environmental Quality in the
administration of the licensing program.
(2) The committee shall be composed of seven (7) five (5) voting
members as follows:
(A) Three (3) Two (2) members, to be appointed by the
commission, shall be solid waste management facility operators licensed by
the division;
(B) One (1) member, to be appointed by the commission,
shall be an employee of a county operating a solid waste management facility
who holds the position of solid waste management facility on-site operator or
supervisor;
(C) One (1) member, to be appointed by the commission,
shall be or an employee of a municipality operating a sanitary landfill who
holds the position of landfill on-site operator or supervisor;
03-05-2025 13:50:37 JMB237

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 H3/5/25 SB265
(D)(C) One (1) member, to be appointed by the commission,
shall be a representative of one (1) of the duly constituted regional solid
waste management boards;
(E)(D) One (1) member, to be appointed by the commission,
shall be an on-site operator or supervisor of a nonsegregated materials
recovery, transfer, or composting facility;
(F)(E) One (1) member, to be appointed by the commission,
shall be a representative of a designated solid waste operator training
academy and shall serve ex officio with no vote; and
(G)(F) One (1) member, to be appointed by the Director of
the Division of Environmental Quality, shall be a qualified member of his or
her staff who shall serve ex officio with no vote as executive secretary of
the committee.
(b)(1) In the event of a vacancy, a new member shall be appointed by
the commission to serve out the unexpired term.
(2)(A) A nonstate agency member shall not serve more than two
(2) consecutive three-year terms.
(B) Those members serving unexpired five-year terms may
serve an additional one (1) consecutive three-year term.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 8-6-905(2), concerning the powers and
duties of the Division of Environmental Quality related to solid waste
licensing, is amended to read as follows:
(2) To issue licenses to qualified solid waste management
facility operators, to renew those licenses, to suspend or revoke the
licenses for cause after due notice and opportunity for hearing, to issue
one-year two-year apprenticeship licenses to operators-in-training, and to
issue provisional certificates; and

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 8-6-2010(a)(1), concerning an applicant's
eligibility as an environmental officer, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) An individual is eligible to apply for initial training as an
environmental officer if the individual is a current employee of a
municipality, city, county, regional solid waste management district,
planning and development district, or state agency, board, or commission.

03-05-2025 13:50:37 JMB237

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 H3/5/25 SB265
/s/Irvin



































03-05-2025 13:50:37 JMB237